Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.011

Classification as resident or nonresident student—Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the legislature that the state institutions of higher education shall apply uniform rules as prescribed in RCW 28B.15.012 through 28B.15.014, and not otherwise, in determining whether students shall be classified as resident students or nonresident students for all tuition and fee purposes.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 273 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 273: "If any provision of this 1971 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provisions to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1971 ex.s. c 273 s 6.]